Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 3. Accounting Practices

§ 13-3-301.
Losses to be charged to surplus fund.

Any losses sustained by a bank in excess of its undivided profits shall be charged to its surplus fund. The surplus fund shall subsequently be reimbursed from earnings. No dividends shall be declared or paid by any bank in excess of one-half (1/2) of its net earnings until the surplus fund is fully restored to its former amount or an amount equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the paid up capital.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 26; R.S. 1931, § 10-126; C.S. 1945, § 35-127; W.S. 1957, § 13-14; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

§ 13-3-302.
Bad debts.

All demand and matured debts due to any bank on which interest has not been paid for a period of at least twelve (12) months, unless in the judgment of the state banking commissioner the debts are well secured or are in the process of collection, are bad debts and shall be charged in whole or in part to the reserve for losses or to undivided profits upon instructions of the state banking commissioner or any duly appointed examiner.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 34; R.S. 1931, § 10-135; C.S. 1945, § 35-138; W.S. 1957, § 13-25; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-3-303.
Value of stocks held.

All investments in any bank in stocks of any corporation authorized by W.S.

13-3-202

shall be entered on the books of the bank at a sum not to exceed the actual cost to the bank. The state banking commissioner may require an asset to be charged down to its actual value.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 33; R.S. 1931, § 10-134; C.S. 1945, § 35-137; W.S. 1957, § 13-65; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-3-304.
Dividends.

The board of directors may, quarterly, semiannually or annually, declare a dividend of so much of the net profits of the bank as they judge proper, except that no dividends shall be declared until the surplus fund of the bank equals its common capital unless there has been carried to the surplus fund not less than ten percent (10%) of the bank’s net profits of the preceding six (6) consecutive months in the case of quarterly or semiannual dividends, or not less than ten percent (10%) of its net profits of the preceding twelve (12) consecutive months in the case of annual dividends. For the purposes of this section, any amounts paid into a fund for the retirement of any preferred stock of any bank out of its net profits for such period are deemed to be additions to its surplus fund if, upon retirement of the preferred stock, the amounts paid into the retirement fund may then properly be carried to surplus. In such case, the bank is obligated to transfer to surplus the amounts paid into the retirement fund on account of the preferred stock as the stock is retired.

The approval of the state banking commissioner is required if the total of all dividends declared by the bank in any calendar year shall exceed the total of its net profits of that year combined with its retained net profits of the preceding two (2) years, less any required transfers to surplus or a fund for the retirement of any preferred stock.

For the purpose of this section:

“Net profits” means the net income or loss reported by a bank in its report of condition and income;

“Retained net profits” for any period shall be equal to the net income or loss reported in the report of condition and income less any common or preferred stock dividends declared or otherwise charged to the undivided profits of the period for which the retained net profits are computed.

No dividend shall be declared by the board of directors of any bank which is operating under any form of regulatory action without prior written approval of the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 24; R.S. 1931, § 10-124; Laws 1939, ch. 24, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 35-125; W.S. 1957, § 13-54; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1985, ch. 162, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1992, ch. 46, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1998, ch. 64, § 1; 1999, ch. 42, § 2.